Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1,104
University of Nebraska Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources; established; administration.

A University of Nebraska Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources shall be established at the University of Nebraska-Lincoln which shall embrace but not be limited to the following divisions or administrative units: (1) College of Agricultural Sciences and Natural Resources; (2) Agricultural Research Division; (3) Cooperative Extension Service; (4) Conservation and Survey Division; and (5) a veterinary medicine and surgery program as a cooperative program only as provided in section 85-180.13. The University of Nebraska Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources shall be headed by a vice chancellor and each division or administrative unit shall have a dean, director, or other chief administrative officer.

Laws 1973, LB 149, § 3;

Laws 1987, LB 656, § 5;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 72.